Rhode Island, session 2025, SB695.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 104
THE RHODE ISLAND CLINICIAN WELLNESS AND SUPPORT ACT
23-104-1. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Rhode Island Clinician Wellness and
Support Act."
23-104-2. Purpose.
The purpose of this act is to protect and promote the well-being of physicians, physician
assistants, dentists and podiatrists.
23-104-3. Authority.
The director of the department of health or the director’s designee are authorized to oversee
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
23-104-4. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Clinician” means a physician, physician assistant, dentist or podiatrist who seeks
and/or receives support from a health program defined in this chapter.
(2) “Physician health program (PHP) ” means the Rhode Island physician health program,

a confidential resource program established and administered by the Rhode Island Medical Society
or a comparable organization to promote and support the physical and mental well-being of
physicians, physician assistants, dentists, and podiatrists who may benefit from help to address
physical and/or behavioral health concerns that may be affecting their personal and professional
quality of life.
23-104-5. Recognition and expansion of confidential clinician wellness programs.
Physicians, physician assistants, podiatrists, and dentists.
(1) The physician health program (PHP) or comparable program shall be recognized as a
designated entity to provide confidential, non-disciplinary assistance to physicians, physician
assistants, dentists, and podiatrists experiencing burnout, mental health challenges, or substance
use disorders.
(2) The PHP shall continue working with professional medical, dental, podiatric, and
physician assistant associations, private healthcare organizations, and insurers to support physician,
physician assistant, dentist, and podiatrist wellness resources without reliance on state funding.
(3) The PHP shall maintain its early intervention and peer support programs to help
clinicians seek care before health conditions impact patient safety.
23-104-6. Confidentiality protections for clinicians seeking assistance.
(a) Clinicians who voluntarily seek help through the PHP or comparable program shall be
protected from automatic reporting to their respective licensing boards, provided the clinician
complies with treatment recommendations and does not pose a risk to patient safety.
(b) Communications between clinicians and personnel of the PHP or comparable program
shall be confidential and privileged under Rhode Island law, similar to attorney-client and peer
support protections.
(c) The PHP or comparable program may act as intermediaries between clinicians and the
relevant licensing board to ensure that clinicians can obtain care without unnecessary professional
repercussions.
23-104-7. Licensing and reporting reforms.
Mental health disclosure reform.
(1) The board of examiners in podiatry (chapter 29 of title 5), the board of examiners in
dentistry (chapter 31.1 of title 5), the board of medical licensure and discipline (chapter 37 of title
5), and the board for physician assistants (chapter 54 of title 5) shall revise licensing and renewal
applications to:
(i) Eliminate broad questions regarding past mental health diagnoses.
(ii) Limit inquiries to current impairments affecting safe practice that are not being
LC002266/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

appropriately managed.
(iii) Emphasize that seeking mental health or substance abuse treatment will not
automatically result in disciplinary action.
(2) The boards shall conform licensing requirements to those of the Federation of State
Medical Boards and national best practices to ensure that mental health questions focus on
functional ability and not diagnosis history.
23-104-8. Safe haven.
(a) A safe haven is established whereby a clinician who self-refers to the PHP or
comparable program shall be protected from mandatory reporting to the professional licensing
board.
(b) A PHP or comparable program shall serve as a confidential liaison between the clinician
and the professional licensing board when the clinician:
(1) Is actively engaged in a PHP or comparable program; and
(2) Is compliant with treatment.
(c) Licensing boards shall not penalize clinicians solely for seeking assistance unless there
is an imminent risk to patient safety.
23-104-9. Controlling law.
Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provision of any other law
of this state, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002266/SUB A
========
LC002266/SUB A - Page 3 of 4